test/src/morphology/N-keestes_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ǩeeˊstes e-stem pöllö: # Noun - full paradigm
     ǩeeˊstes+N+Sg+Nom: ǩeeˊstes
     ǩeeˊstes+N+Sg+Gen: ǩeâstta
     ǩeeˊstes+N+Sg+Acc: ǩeâstta
     ǩeeˊstes+N+Sg+Ill: ǩeâsttsa
     ǩeeˊstes+N+Sg+Loc: ǩeâsttsest
     ǩeeˊstes+N+Sg+Com: ǩeâsttsin
     ǩeeˊstes+N+Ess: ǩeâsttsen
     ǩeeˊstes+N+Par: ǩeâsttsed
     ǩeeˊstes+N+Sg+Abe: ǩeâsttatää
     ǩeeˊstes+N+Pl+Nom: ǩeâstta
     ǩeeˊstes+N+Pl+Gen: ǩeâsttsi
     ǩeeˊstes+N+Pl+Acc: ǩeâsttsid
     ǩeeˊstes+N+Pl+Ill: ǩeâsttsid
     ǩeeˊstes+N+Pl+Loc: ǩeâsttsin
     ǩeeˊstes+N+Pl+Com: ǩeâsttsivuiˊm
     ǩeeˊstes+N+Pl+Abe: ǩeâsttsitää
